Mississippi statutes. Title 55. Parks and Recreation
Grand Gulf Military Monument Commission

§ 55-15-21.
Creation of commission; composition; qualifications, appointment and terms of office of members.

There is hereby created and established the Grand Gulf Military Monument Commission, to be composed of five (5) members, all to be resident citizens of Claiborne County, Mississippi. The members shall be appointed by the governor and shall serve for a period of five (5) years.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6021-01; Laws, 1958, ch. 594, § 1; Laws, 1970, ch. 268, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved February 18, 1970).

§ 55-15-23.
Organization; officers; meetings.

Immediately after said members are named and commissioned, they shall meet at the county courthouse in Claiborne County, or at an otherwise appropriate place in Claiborne County, and proceed to organize said commission by the election of a chairman and a secretary-treasurer. Annually thereafter, said commissioners shall hold their regular meeting for the election of officers and for the transaction of other business. They shall meet at any other time upon the call of the chairman.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6021-02; Laws, 1958, ch. 594, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 29, 1958).

§ 55-15-25.
Powers and duties of commission.

Said commission is authorized, empowered and directed to make careful study and examination of the battlefields of the Grand Gulf Military Area, located in Claiborne County, Mississippi; to make all necessary surveys in preparation to the acquisition of the Grand Gulf Military Area; to identify and establish the battle lines, maneuvers and positions; and to designate such historic, memorable areas with markers, monuments or other suitable means of identification.

Said commission is hereby authorized to receive any contributions in money, property of any kind, or donations of land that might be made by patriotic citizens to carry out the objects and purposes of Sections 55-15-21 through 55-15-31; to acquire options or titles to parts or all of said Grand Gulf Military Area and to exercise the right of eminent domain in acquiring said lands in the manner now provided by law; and to hold same in the name and for the benefit of the State of Mississippi, all to the end that the Grand Gulf Military Area may be ultimately established and permanently maintained and operated as an historical park.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6021-03; Laws, 1958, ch. 594, § 3; Laws, 1959, Ex. Sess. ch. 20.

§ 55-15-27.
Donations to commission.

The board of supervisors of Claiborne County, Mississippi, and the mayor and board of aldermen of the town of Port Gibson, Mississippi, are hereby authorized to make donations to the Grand Gulf Military Monument Commission, to be used for the acquisition, establishment or maintenance of said Grand Gulf Military Area as an historical park.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6021-04; Laws, 1958, ch. 594, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved April 29, 1958).

§ 55-15-29.
Operation of historical park.

The Grand Gulf Military Monument Commission is authorized and directed to establish, operate and maintain said area as an historical park as, if and when a part or all of said land has been acquired by the Grand Gulf Military Monument Commission for the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6021-05; Laws, 1958, ch. 594, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved April 29, 1958).

§ 55-15-31.
Reports; records; plans; compensation of members of commission.

Before each annual meeting, and at any other time when requested by the governor, said commission shall make a full, detailed and complete report of its actions, including an accounting of any receipts and expenditure of funds. Said commission shall at all times keep its records subject to public inspection. Said commission shall also outline a program for the ensuing year, and make recommendations for the accomplishments of its objects and purposes. None of the funds that may be donated or received by said commission shall be used or expended as compensation for any of said commissioners, but said funds may be used to pay the actual expenses of the commissioners while engaged in official business of the commission.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6021-06; Laws, 1958, ch. 594, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved April 29, 1958).